Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2401.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Capital Budget Act of 2026-2027.Section 2. Overall limitations on debt to be incurred for capital projects.The maximum principal amount of additional debt to be incurred during the 2026-2027 fiscal year, and thereafter until the enactment of the 2027-2028 capital budget specifying the maximum debt for the 2027-2028 fiscal year, for capital projects specifically itemized in a capital budget pursuant to section 7(a)(4) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, and the fund to be charged with the repayment of such debt, shall, with respect to each category of capital projects, be as follows:Category Amount Fund123456789101112131415161718 (1) Public Improvement Projects: (i) Buildings and structures $1,200,000,000 General Fund or Special Fund as applicable(2) Furniture and equipment 20,000,000 General Fund or Special Fund as applicable(3) Transportation assistance projects 100,000,000 General Fund(4) Redevelopment assistance projects 325,000,000 General Fund(5) Flood control projects 0 General FundTotal $1,645,000,000 Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2401PN3077 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819